Utah statutes.
20A-9-503.   Certificate of nomination -- Filing -- Fees.
(1)  After the certificate of nomination has been certified, executed, and
acknowledged by the county clerk, the candidate shall:
(a)  between the second Friday in March and 5 p.m. on the third Friday in
March of the year in which the regular general election will be held, file the
petition in person with:
(i)  the lieutenant governor, if the office the candidate seeks is a
constitutional office or a federal office; or
(ii)  the county clerk, if the office the candidate seeks is a county office;
and
(iii)  pay the filing fee; or
(b)  not later than 5 p.m. on July 15 of any odd-numbered year, file the
petition in person with:
(i)  the municipal clerk, if the candidate seeks an office in a city or town;
(ii)  the local district clerk, if the candidate seeks an office in a local
district; and
(iii)  pay the filing fee.
(2) (a)  At the time of filing, and before accepting the petition, the filing
officer shall read the constitutional and statutory requirements for candidacy
to the candidate.
(b)  If the candidate states that he does not meet the requirements, the
filing officer may not accept the petition.
(3) (a)  Persons filing a certificate of nomination for President of the
United States under this section shall pay a filing fee of $500.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a person filing a certificate of
nomination for President or Vice President of the United States:
(i)  may file the certificate of nomination between the second Friday in March
and 5 p.m. on August 15 of the year in which the regular general election will
be held; and
(ii)  may use a designated agent to file the certificate of nomination.
